Utah statutes.
16-13-12.   Licensing, supervision, and examination by commissioner of financial institutions -- Fees.

A development corporation shall be licensed, supervised, and examined by the commissioner of financial institutions and shall make such report of its condition from time to time as the commissioner shall require.  A development corporation shall pay a fee determined by the commissioner pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for a license and for each examination.

